Arkansas, session 2025, SB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1405(b), concerning the number of
times a person may file a new uniform petition to seal a misdemeanor or
violation conviction, is amended to read as follows:
(b) There is not a limit to the number of times a person may file a
uniform petition to seal his or her record of a misdemeanor or violation,
except that the person may not file:
(1) A new uniform petition to seal one (1) of the following
criminal offenses until after a period of five (5) years has elapsed since
the completion of the person's sentence for the conviction:
(A) Negligent homicide, § 5-10-105, if it was a Class A
*CEB170*
02/20/2025 3:58:22 PM CEB170

SB277
misdemeanor;
(B) Battery in the third degree, § 5-13-203;
(C) Indecent exposure, § 5-14-112;
(D) Public sexual indecency, § 5-14-111;
(E) Sexual assault in the fourth degree, § 5-14-127; or
(F) Domestic battering in the third degree, § 5-26-305;
(2) A new uniform petition to seal a misdemeanor violation
of driving or boating while intoxicated, § 5-65-103, until after the
applicable lookback periods under § 5-65-111 have elapsed;
(3) A new uniform petition to seal a criminal offense listed in
subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(F) or subdivision (b)(2) of this section before one
(1) year from the date of the order denying the previous uniform petition;
(4) A new uniform petition to seal a misdemeanor or violation
before ninety (90) days from the date of an order denying a uniform petition
to seal the misdemeanor or violation;
(5) A new uniform petition to seal a misdemeanor or violation
under this section if an appeal of a previous denial of a uniform petition to
seal a misdemeanor or violation for the same misdemeanor or violation is
still pending; or
(6) A new uniform petition to seal a misdemeanor or violation
under this section if:
(A) The person was a holder of a commercial driver license
or commercial learner's permit at the time the misdemeanor or violation was
committed; and
(B) The misdemeanor or violation was a traffic offense,
other than a parking violation, vehicle weight violation, or vehicle defect
violation, committed in any type of motor vehicle; or
(7) A new uniform petition to seal a misdemeanor violation of
theft of property, § 5-36-103, until after a period of ten (10) years has
elapsed since the date of the offense.






02/20/2025 3:58:22 PM CEB170